California statutes. Public Contract Code
After opening the bids and as convenient the board shall award the contract or contracts for the works either in portions or as a whole to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders, but the board may reject any or all bids and readvertise for proposals or may proceed to construct the works or any part thereof under its own superintendence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20567.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20568.

Contracts for the purchase of material to be furnished or used by the district in the works shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders after such notice as the board deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20569.

Any person to whom a contract may be awarded pursuant to this article shall provide a bond approved by the board, payable to the district for at least 25 percent of the estimated contract price, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 35.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

20570.

The works shall be constructed under the direction and to the satisfaction of the engineer of the district and be subject to the approval of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 36. Water Storage Districts [20580. - 20590.]

20580.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by water storage districts, as provided for in the California Water Storage District Law, Division 14 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20581.

Before making any contract for the construction or improvement of works in carrying out any project totaling twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more, the board shall advertise for bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20582.

When work is to be done, the board shall give notice calling for bids by publication in the county in which the principal office of a district is kept once a week for four consecutive weeks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 551.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20583.

If less than the whole work provided for in the plans and specifications is to be done, the portion to be done must be particularly described in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20584.

The notice shall set forth that:

(a) Plans and specifications of the work to be done can be seen at the office of the board.

(b) The board will receive sealed bids.

(c) The contract will be let to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The bids will be opened in public at a given time and place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20584.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

20585.

The board may either:

(a) Let the work to the lowest responsible bidder.

(b) Reject any or all bids and readvertise for proposals.

(c) Proceed to construct the work under its own superintendence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20586.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20587.

Contracts for the purchase of materials only shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder, except that the board may reject any or all bids for the furnishing of materials only and thereafter either readvertise for bids or solicit offers from not less than three responsible persons to furnish materials.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20588.

Upon receipt of an offer for a less price than that specified in the lowest rejected bid, the board may enter into a contract for the furnishing of the materials with the person who has offered them at the lowest price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20589.

Any person to whom a contract is awarded shall enter into a bond, to be approved by the board, payable to the district for its use, for 25 percent of the amount of the contract price, conditioned for the full and faithful performance of the contract. The work shall be done under the direction and to the satisfaction of, and be approved by, the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 18, Sec. 36.   Effective April 21, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

20590.

All contracts and other documents executed by the board shall be signed by the president and by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 37. County Waterworks Districts [20600. - 20615.]

20600.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by county waterworks districts, as provided for in the County Waterworks District Law, Division 16 (commencing with Section 55000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20601.

All contracts for construction of a work of improvement for the district in excess of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, except that contracts under seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) may be let pursuant to informal bidding procedures established by the board, and except that county waterworks districts may contract with each other, with the county, or, where the district is a subsidiary district of a city, with the city, for furnishing labor, materials, or supplies required for any improvement mentioned in this division upon such terms and conditions as their boards may elect. With the approval of the board of supervisors and the board of directors of the district, if any, or, where the district is a subsidiary district of a city, with the
 approval of the city council, and upon the terms and conditions they may determine, all contracts for construction of a work of improvement for the district, including those under three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500), may be let by the county or city purchasing agent, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 78.1.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

20602.

The district shall advertise in the county pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, inviting sealed proposals for furnishing labor, materials and supplies for the proposed improvement before any contract for construction of a work of improvement for the district shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 78.2.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

20602.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

20603.

The district shall have the right to require such bonds as it may deem best from the successful bidder, to insure the faithful performance of the contract, and shall also have the right to reject any and all bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20604.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the district shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20605.

When the board of supervisors and the board of directors of the district, if any, determine that any work of repairing, improving, renewing or extending district facilities can be done more economically and satisfactorily by day labor without letting contracts to the lowest bidder as provided in Section 20601, the governing body of the district may cause the work to be done by day labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20606.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the county when ordered by the board of supervisors, or the city when ordered by the city council where the district is a subsidiary district of the city, to make the proposed improvement without a contractor therefor, and to purchase the materials and supplies, and employ the labor necessary for the purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20607.

The board of supervisors may, except in incorporated cities or towns, order and contract for any of the work, and the acquisition of any of the property contemplated, to be done or authorized to be acquired under this division, and to provide, if ordered by four-fifths of the members of the board of supervisors, that the cost shall be borne by a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20608.

Any improvement for which bonds are voted under the provisions of this division, shall be made in conformity with the general description of the proposed improvement as provided for in the proceedings authorizing issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20609.

Whenever for any reason water system facilities are proposed to be installed in a district by someone other than the district itself, or the installation cost is proposed to be paid by someone other than the district itself, and the facilities are to be thereafter dedicated to the district for public use, and the board determines that it is necessary and convenient to the purposes of the district that the acceptance of said dedication be conditional upon the water system facilities being adequate to serve land other than and in addition to land proposed by the installer to be served thereby, the board may by contract agree to reimburse and may reimburse the installer for the proportionate part of the total cost of such water system facilities which will serve and benefit other land, upon such terms as may be agreed upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20610.

The reimbursement contract may provide that the reimbursement will be made in periodic payments over an agreed period of time not to exceed 10 years, exclusively out of charges imposed upon land and collected from persons owning the land other than the land proposed by the installer to be served by the water system facilities. The other land that may connect to and be served by the water system facilities shall be specified in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20611.

Under no circumstances shall the total amount of all reimbursement payments made or agreed to be made exceed the amount, specified in said contract, for the total cost of the water system facilities exclusive of the costs attributable to the land of the installer. An amount attributable to interest may also be included in the contract, at a rate not to exceed 4 percent per annum from the date of installation to the date of connection of other land to the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20612.

Whenever a district has contracted to reimburse an installer for the installation of water system facilities, it may impose upon land and collect from any person owning the land, other than the land designated in the contract as proposed by the installer to be served therefrom, which may connect to and receive water service from or through said water system facilities, a reasonable charge representing the proportionate share of the estimated cost of replacement or the proportionate share of the total installation cost of said water system facilities which is fairly attributable to the land which may receive water service. An amount attributable to interest may be included in the charge at a rate not to exceed 4 percent per annum from the date of installation to the date of connection of other land to the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20613.

All charges collected under Section 20612 shall be paid into the treasury of the district and treated in the same manner as other water revenues, except as otherwise provided in this chapter and the reimbursement contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20614.

(a) The board of supervisors and the board of directors of the district, if any, may, by ordinance, resolution, or board order, authorize the general manager or other district officer to order changes or additions in the work being performed under contracts made pursuant to this article in an amount not to exceed:

(1) For contracts whose original cost is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) For contracts whose original cost is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the
 amount of the change or addition shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract.

(3) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract that is in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). Notwithstanding subdivision (b), no change or addition shall exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000).

(b) The County of Los Angeles may elect to be subject to all of the following provisions: 

(1) For contracts whose original cost exceeds twenty-five million dollars
 ($25,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index. 

(2) For contracts whose original cost exceeds fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), adjusted annually to reflect the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index.

(3) If the board of supervisors delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the decision by the county engineer or other county officer whom authority was delegated to shall be binding
 on the County of Los Angeles, and all existing protest and grievance procedures regarding that decision remain valid. 

(4) At the time the board delegates authority in the manner specified in subdivision (a) with regard to the contract costs specified in this subdivision, the board shall implement appropriate measures to prevent fraud and ensure accountability for that delegated authority.

(5) This subdivision does not apply if the sum of the contracts modified under this subdivision, subdivision (c) of Section 20142, subdivision (b) of Section 20395, subdivision (e) of Section 20405, and subdivision (b) of Section 20998, exceeds seven contracts.

(6) If a contract is modified under this subdivision, the County of Los
 Angeles shall provide a review report to the Assembly Committee on Local Government and the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance no later than July 1, 2026.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 7.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20614.

The board of supervisors and the board of directors of the district, if any, may, by ordinance, resolution, or board order, authorize the general manager or other district officer to order changes or additions in the work being performed under contracts made pursuant to this article in an amount not to exceed:

(a) For contracts whose original cost is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the amount of the change or addition shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(b) For contracts whose original cost is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the amount of the change or
 addition shall not exceed 10 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract.

(c) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the cost of the original contract that is in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any change or addition exceed two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000).

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 95, Sec. 8.   (AB 712)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20615.

(a) Contracts by the district for private architectural, landscape architectural, professional engineering, environmental, land surveying, and construction project management services may be let by the board or any officer authorized by the board pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) Contracts by the district for special services, as provided in Section 31000 of the Government Code, may be let by the board or any officer authorized by the board pursuant to Section 31000 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 78.3.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 38. County Drainage Districts [20620. - 20624.]

20620.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by county drainage districts, as provided for in the County Drainage District Act, Division 17 (commencing with Section 56000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20621.

Upon completion of the precise plans and specifications, the work or any portion of it may be done in any of the following ways as ordered by the district board:

(a) By purchasing the material and doing the work by day labor.

(b) By purchasing the material and letting a contract for the doing of the work.

(c) By purchasing only a portion or none of the material and letting a contract for furnishing the balance or all of the material and the doing of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20622.

Any contract for the doing of the work and furnishing any or all of the material shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder submitting a sealed bid in response to a notice calling for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20623.

The notice shall be published once a week for at least two successive weeks in a newspaper circulated in the county and shall refer to precise plans and specifications covering the work to be done and materials, if any, to be furnished. If the material to be purchased costs over one thousand dollars ($1,000), and there is no purchasing agent, the material shall be purchased from the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20624.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 39. Levee Districts [20630. - 20635.]

20630.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by levee districts, as provided for in the Levee District Law of 1959, Division 19 (commencing with Section 70000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20631.

Contracts in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the construction or repair of any levees or associated works, unless the construction or repair is done under its own superintendence, shall be made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20632.

The board shall give notice by publication, pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code, in calling for bids for the construction or repair of any of the levees or associated works of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20633.

The notice calling for bids shall contain:

(a) A statement that the plans and specifications of the construction or repairs may be seen at the district office.

(b) A particular description of the construction or repair advertised if less than the whole construction or repair is advertised.

(c) A statement that the board will receive sealed bids for the construction or repairs advertised or any portion of them designated by the board.

(d) A statement that the contract or contracts for the construction or repair advertised will be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders, but that any and all bids may be rejected.

(e) A statement of the time and place for opening the bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20633.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

20634.

After opening the bids, and as convenient, the board shall award the contract or contracts for the construction or repair in portions, or as a whole, to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders, but the board may reject any and all bids and readvertise for proposals or may proceed to construct the works or any part thereof under its own superintendence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20635.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 40. Municipal Water Districts [20640. - 20645.]

20640.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by municipal water districts, as provided for in the Municipal Water District Law of 1911, Division 20 (commencing with Section 71000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20641.

A district may prescribe methods for the construction of works and for the letting of contracts for any of the following purposes:

(a) The construction of works, structures or equipment.

(b) The performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies, necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the purposes of this division.

(c) The acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20642.

When work is not to be done by the district itself by force account, and the amount involved is thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), or more, any contract for the doing of the work shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, after publication, in the manner prescribed by the board, of notices inviting bids therefor. However, the board may reject any and all proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20642.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

20643.

Notwithstanding Section 20642, contracts, in writing or otherwise, for the acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property may be let without calling for competitive bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20644.

The board may, from time to time, establish the manner of calling for bids and letting contracts, but except as such procedure so established by the board otherwise requires, all contracts may be entered into upon such terms and in such manner as the board may authorize.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20645.

In the case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 8.6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 41. Community College Districts [20650. - 20662.]

20650.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by community college districts as provided for in Part 49 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

20651.

(a) The governing board of any community college district shall let any contracts involving an expenditure of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any of the following:

(1) The purchase of equipment, materials, or supplies to be furnished, sold, or leased to the district.

(2) Services, except construction services.

(3) Repairs, including maintenance as defined in Section 20656, that are not a public project as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002.

The contract shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder who shall give security as the board requires, or else reject all bids.

(b) The governing board shall let any contract for a public project, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002, involving an expenditure of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more to the lowest responsible bidder who shall give security as the board requires, or else reject all bids. All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(1) Cash.

(2) A cashier’s check made payable to the community college district.

(3) A certified check made payable to the community college district.

(4) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the community college district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(c) This section applies to all equipment, materials, or supplies, whether patented or otherwise. This section shall not apply to professional services or advice, insurance services, or any other purchase or service otherwise exempt from this section, or to any works done by day labor or by force account pursuant to Section 20655.

(d) Commencing January 1, 1997, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall annually adjust the dollar amounts specified in subdivision (a) to reflect the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the prior fiscal year. The annual adjustments shall be rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20651.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, the advertising, bidding, and protest provisions of this article and Division 7 (commencing with Section 70900) of Title 3 of the Education Code, but subject to Section 88003.1, the governing board of a community college district may award a contract for the acquisition of goods, services, or information technology that has an estimated value of greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000), but less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), to a certified small business, including a microbusiness, or to a disabled veteran business enterprise, if the community college district obtains price quotations from two or more certified small businesses,
 including microbusinesses, or from two or more disabled veteran business enterprises.

(b) In carrying out subdivision (a), a community college district shall consider a responsive offer timely received from a responsible certified small business, including a microbusiness, or from a disabled veteran business enterprise.

(c) The definitions set forth in Section 14837 of the Government Code apply to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 262, Sec. 3.   (AB 173)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

20651.5.

(a) The governing board of any community college district may require each prospective bidder for a contract, as described under Section 20651, to complete and submit to the district a standardized questionnaire and financial statement in a form specified by the district, including a complete statement of the prospective bidder’s financial ability and experience in performing public works. The questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. The questionnaire responses of prospective bidders and their financial statements shall not be deemed public records and shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) Any community college district requiring prospective bidders to complete and submit questionnaires and financial statements, as described in subdivision (a), shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders on the basis of the completed questionnaires and financial statements, in order to determine the size of the contracts upon which each bidder shall be deemed financially qualified to bid. The prequalification of a prospective bidder shall neither limit nor preclude a district’s subsequent consideration of a prequalified bidder’s responsibility on factors other than the prospective bidder’s financial qualifications.

(c) Each prospective bidder on any contract described under Section 20651 that is subject to this section shall be furnished, by the community college district letting the contract, with a standardized proposal form that, when completed and executed, shall be submitted as his or her bid. Bids not presented on the forms so furnished shall be deemed nonresponsive and shall be rejected. A proposal form shall not be accepted from any person who, or other entity which, is required to submit a completed questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification pursuant to subdivision (a), but who or which has not done so at least five days prior to the date fixed for the public opening of sealed bids and has not been prequalified, pursuant to subdivision (b), at least one day prior to that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 657, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20651.7.

(a) For the purposes of bid evaluation and selection pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20651, when a community college district determines that it can expect long-term savings through the use of life-cycle cost methodology, the use of more sustainable goods and materials, and reduced administrative costs, the community college district may provide for the selection of the lowest responsible bidder on the basis of best value pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the governing board in accordance with this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “best value” means the most advantageous balance of price, quality, service, performance, and other elements, as defined by the governing board, achieved through methods in accordance with this section and
 determined by objective performance criteria that may include price, features, long-term functionality, life-cycle costs, overall sustainability, and required services.

(c) A community college district shall consider all of the following when adopting best value policies pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Price and service level proposals that reduce the district’s overall operating costs, including end-of-life expenditures and impact.

(2) Equipment, services, supplies, and materials standards that support the community college district’s strategic acquisition and management program direction.

(3) A procedure for protest and resolution.

(d) A community college district may consider any of
 the following factors if adopting policies and procedures pursuant to subdivision (c):

(1) The total cost to the community college district of its purchase, use, and consumption of equipment, supplies, and materials.

(2) The operational cost or benefit incurred by the community college district as a result of a contract award.

(3) The added value to the community college district, as defined in the request for proposal, of vendor-added services.

(4) The quality and effectiveness of equipment, supplies, materials, and services.

(5) The reliability of delivery and installation schedules.

(6) The terms and conditions of product
 warranties and vendor guarantees.

(7) The financial stability of the vendor.

(8) The vendor’s quality assurance program.

(9) The vendor’s experience with the provisions of equipment, supplies, materials, and services within the institutional marketplace.

(10) The consistency of the vendor’s proposed equipment, supplies, materials, and services with the district’s overall supplies and materials procurement program.

(11) The economic benefits to the local community, including, but not limited to, job creation and retention.

(12) The environmental benefits to the local community.

(e) A community college district awarding a contract under this section shall award a contract to the lowest responsible bidder whose proposal is determined, in writing by the community college district, to be the best value to the community college district based solely on the criteria set forth in the request for proposal.

(f) The governing board of a community college district shall issue a written notice of intent to award supporting its contract award and stating in detail the basis of the award. The notice of the intent to award and the contract file must be sufficient to satisfy an external audit.

(g) The governing board of a community college district shall publicly announce its award, identifying the bidder to which the award is made, the price proposal of the contractor awarded the contract, and the overall
 combined rating on the request for proposal evaluation factors. The announcement shall also include the ranking of the contractor awarded the contract in relation to all other responsive bidders and their respective price proposals and summary of the rationale for the contract award.

(h) The community college district shall ensure that all businesses have a fair and equitable opportunity to compete for, and participate in, district contracts and shall also ensure that discrimination, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 12751.3 of the Public Utilities Code, in the award and performance of contracts does not occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   (AB 3186)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20652.
